West Virginia, session 2025, SB443.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 32. SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGISTS AND AUDIOLOGISTS. §30-32-11a. Criminal History Record Checks. (a) The West Virginia Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology may require state and national criminal history record checks for the purpose of issuing licenses. The West Virginia Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology shall require an applicant, including speech-language pathologists, audiologists, speech-language pathology, hearing aid dealers, and audiology assistants, as a condition of eligibility for provisional and initial license to submit to a state and national criminal history record check as set forth in this section. (b) The applicant shall meet all requirements necessary to accomplish the state and national criminal history record check, including:(1) Submitting fingerprints for the purposes set forth in this subsection; and(2) Authorizing the board, the West Virginia State Police, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to use all records submitted and produced for the purpose of screening the applicant for a license.(c) The results of the state and national criminal history record check may not be released to or by a private entity except:(1) To the individual who is the subject of the criminal history record check;(2) With the written authorization of the individual who is the subject of the criminal history record check; or(3) Pursuant to a court order.(d) The criminal history record check and related records are not public records for the purposes of §29B-1-1 et seq.(e) The applicant shall ensure that the criminal history record check is completed as soon as possible after the date of the original application for licensure.(f) The applicant shall pay the actual costs of the fingerprinting and criminal history record check.(g) The board may propose rules or amendments to existing rules for legislative approval, pursuant to the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq., or may promulgate emergency rules, pursuant to §29A-3-15, to comply with the provisions of this section.